Louisiana, session 2026, HB729.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:261.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§261.1. Receptacle removal; state road rights-of-way
A. All garbage and recycling receptacles placed in the right-of-way of a state
road for regularly scheduled curbside pickup shall be removed from the right-of- way
by the end of the day of collection.
B. Any person that fails to comply with the provisions of this Section shall
be subject to the following fines:
(1) One hundred dollars for a first offense.
(2) Two hundred dollars for a second offense.
(3) Three hundred dollars for a third or subsequent offense.
C. Any political subdivision responsible for maintaining the right-of-way of
a state road may enforce the provisions of this Section as to the rights-of-way it
maintains.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-598 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 729